Utah statutes.
16-10a-624.   Share options and other rights.
(1)  Subject to any provisions in its articles of incorporation, a corporation
may create and issue, whether or not in connection with the issue and sale of
any shares or other securities of the corporation, rights or options for the
purchase of shares or assets of the corporation.  The board of directors shall
determine the terms upon which the rights or options are issued, their form
and content, and the consideration for which the shares are to be issued.
(2)  The terms and conditions of the options or rights may include
restrictions or conditions that:
(a)  preclude or limit the exercise, transfer, or receipt of the options or
rights by any person owning or offering to acquire a specified number or
percentage of the outstanding common shares or other securities of the
corporation or any transferee of that person; or
(b)  invalidate or void the options or rights.
(3)  This section applies to all options and rights notwithstanding the date
of grant.
